Idaho, session 2026, H0620.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 8, Title 31, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 31-882, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
31-882. SPECIAL EXPERTISE OF BOARDS OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS -- CO-
ORDINATION OF PLANNING EFFORTS WITH FEDERAL AGENCIES. (1) When a board of
county commissioners represents a county as a cooperating agency in mat-
ters related to the national environmental policy act and in federal land
planning, implementation, and management actions, the board of county com-
missioners shall be deemed to have special expertise on all subject matters
for which it has statutory responsibility, including but not limited to
those directly or indirectly related to the health, safety, welfare, custom,
culture, and socioeconomic viability of a county.
(2) A board of county commissioners that has adopted a comprehensive
plan pursuant to section 67-6508, Idaho Code, may participate in efforts to
coordinate such plan with federal agencies as provided in:
(a) The multiple-use sustained-yield act of 1960;
(b) The forest and rangeland renewable resources planning act of 1974,
as amended by the national forest management act of 1976;
(c) The federal land policy and management act of 1976;
(d) Any federal regulations adopted pursuant to the acts listed in
paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection; and
(e) Any other federal statutes that provide for coordination with local
governments.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.